Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 3. Escape and Related Offenses.

Collateral references. —

27A Am. Jur. 2d, Escape, § 1 et seq.

30A C.J.S., Escape, § 1 et seq.

Escape or prison breach as affected by means employed, 96 ALR2d 520.

Escape from public employee or institution other than correctional or law enforcement employee or institution as criminal offense, 69 ALR3d 625.

Escape from custody of private person as criminal offense, 69 ALR3d 664.

Failure of prisoner to return at expiration of work furlough or other permissive release period as crime of escape, 76 ALR3d 658.

Temporary unauthorized absence of prisoner as escape or attempted escape, 76 ALR3d 695.

What justifies escape, 54 ALR5th 141.

Sec. 11.56.300.
Escape in the first degree.

One commits the crime of escape in the first degree if, without lawful authority, one removes oneself from official detention by means of a deadly weapon or a defensive weapon.

Escape in the first degree is a class A felony.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 59 SLA 1991)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A felonies, see AS

12.55.125(c)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.56.310.
Escape in the second degree.

One commits the crime of escape in the second degree if, without lawful authority, one

removes oneself from

a secure correctional facility while under official detention for a misdemeanor;

official detention for a felony or for extradition; or

official detention and, during the escape or at any time before being restored to official detention, one possesses on or about oneself a firearm;

violates AS

11.56.335

or

11.56.340

and, during the time of the unlawful evasion or at any time before being restored to official detention, one possesses on or about oneself a firearm; or

while under official detention for a felony,

removes, tampers with, or disables the electronic monitoring equipment; or

without prior authorization, leaves one’s residence or other place designated by the commissioner of corrections or the commissioner of health and social services for service by electronic monitoring.

In this section, “secure correctional facility” means a correctional facility that

has construction fixtures or security features that are designed to restrict the ability of a person under official detention from leaving the facility without lawful authority; or

has correctional officers or other persons authorized by the commissioner of corrections to prevent a person under official detention from leaving without lawful authority.

Escape in the second degree is a class B felony.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 17 ch 102 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 51 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 116 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 57 SLA 2006; am §§ 2, 3 ch 65 SLA 2012; am § 34 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (c) was enacted as subsection (b), and subsection (b) was enacted as subsection (c).
Relettered in 2012.

Cross references. —

For punishment of class B felonies, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For applicability provision relating to the definition in (b) and to the 2012 amendment of subsection (a), see § 6, ch. 65, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, rewrote (a)(3), which read, “removes, tampers with, or disables the electronic monitoring equipment, or leaves one’s residence or other place designated by the commissioner of corrections for the service by electronic monitoring of official detention for a felony.”

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of (a) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Legislative history reports. —

For a report on Chapter 102, SLA 1980 (HCS CSSB 511), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement, No. 44, May 29, 1980, or 1980 House Journal Supplement, No. 79, May 29, 1980.

Sec. 11.56.320.
Escape in the third degree.

One commits the crime of escape in the third degree if one

removes oneself from official detention during any lawful movement or activity incident to confinement within a correctional facility for a misdemeanor;

violates AS

11.56.335

or

11.56.340

and leaves or attempts to leave the state;

while under official detention for a misdemeanor,

removes, tampers with, or disables the electronic monitoring equipment; or

without prior authorization, leaves one’s residence or other place designated by the commissioner of corrections or the commissioner of health and social services for service by electronic monitoring; or

while on release under AS 12.30,

removes, tampers with, or disables the electronic monitoring equipment; or

without prior authorization, leaves one’s residence or other place designated by a judicial officer as a condition of release.

Escape in the third degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 18 ch 102 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 51 SLA 1995; am § 2 ch 57 SLA 2006; am § 35 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, added (a)(3) and (a)(4), and made related stylistic changes.

Editor's notes. —

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of (a) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Legislative history reports. —

For a report on Chapter 102, SLA 1980 (HCS CSSB 511), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement, No. 44, May 29, 1980, or 1980 House Journal Supplement, No. 79, May 29, 1980.

Sec. 11.56.330.
Escape in the fourth degree.

One commits the crime of escape in the fourth degree if, without lawful authority, one

removes oneself from official detention for a misdemeanor;

having been placed under actual restraint by a peace officer before arrest, removes oneself from the restraint.

[Repealed, § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019.]

Escape in the fourth degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 19 ch 102 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 91 SLA 1991; am § 2 ch 116 SLA 1998; am § 138 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For legislative purpose of the 1991 amendments to subsection (a), see § 1,
ch. 91, SLA 1991 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, repealed (a)(3).

Legislative history reports. —

For a report on Chapter 102, SLA 1980 (HCS CSSB 511), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement, No. 44, May 29, 1980, or 1980 House Journal Supplement, No. 79, May 29, 1980.

Sec. 11.56.335.
Unlawful evasion in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of unlawful evasion in the first degree if, while charged with or convicted of a felony,

the person fails to return to official detention within the time authorized following temporary leave granted for a specific purpose or limited period, including leave granted under AS

33.30.181

; or

while on furlough under AS

33.30.101

—

33.30.131

, the person fails to return to the place of confinement or residence within the time authorized by those having direct supervision.

Unlawful evasion in the first degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 3 ch 57 SLA 2006)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.56.340.
Unlawful evasion in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of unlawful evasion in the second degree if, while charged with or convicted of a misdemeanor,

the person fails to return to official detention within the time authorized following temporary leave granted for a specific purpose or limited period, including leave granted under AS

33.30.181

; or

while on furlough under AS

33.30.101

—

33.30.131

, the person fails to return to the place of confinement or residence within the time authorized by those having direct supervision.

Unlawful evasion in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 88 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 51 SLA 1995; am § 4 ch 57 SLA 2006)

Cross references. —

Definition of “official detention,” “deadly weapon,” “correctional facility,” “firearm,” “possess” — AS

11.81.900(b)

.

Permitting an escape — AS

11.56.370

Promoting contraband — AS

11.56.375

,

11.56.380

Justification: Use of force by guards — AS

11.81.410

Confinement to correctional restitution center — AS

33.30.181

Furloughs — AS

33.30.101

—

33.30.131

Original Code Provisions — AS 11.30.090; AS 11.30.093; AS 11.30.095.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.56.350.
Unlawful evasion in the second degree. [Repealed, § 6 ch 51 SLA 1995.]

Sec. 11.56.370.
Permitting an escape.

A public servant who is required by law to have charge of a person arrested for, charged with, or convicted of a crime commits the crime of permitting an escape if with criminal negligence the public servant permits a person under official detention to escape.

Permitting an escape is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 20 ch 102 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

Definition of “public servant,” “law” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “criminal negligence” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Original Code Provision — AS 11.30.120.

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Legislative history reports. —

For a report on Chapter 102, SLA 1980 (HCS CSSB 511), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement, No. 44, May 29, 1980, or 1980 House Journal Supplement, No. 79, May 29, 1980.

Sec. 11.56.375.
Promoting contraband in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of promoting contraband in the first degree if the person violates AS

11.56.380

and the contraband is

a deadly weapon or a defensive weapon;

an article that is intended by the defendant to be used as a means of facilitating an escape; or

a controlled substance.

Promoting contraband in the first degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 3 ch 59 SLA 1991)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Administrative Code. —

For admission to adult correctional facilities, see 22 AAC 5, art. 1.

For security, see 22 AAC 5, art. 2.

Sec. 11.56.380.
Promoting contraband in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of promoting contraband in the second degree if the person

introduces, takes, conveys, or attempts to introduce, take, or convey contraband into a correctional facility; or

makes, obtains, possesses, or attempts to make, obtain, or possess anything that person knows to be contraband while under official detention within a correctional facility.

Promoting contraband in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Administrative Code. —

For admission to adult correctional facilities, see 22 AAC 5, art. 1.

For security, see 22 AAC 5, art. 2.

Sec. 11.56.390.
Definition.

In AS

11.56.300

—

11.56.390

, “contraband” means any article or thing which persons confined in a correctional facility are prohibited by law from obtaining, making, or possessing in that correctional facility.

History.

(§ 6 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “knowingly,” “correctional facility,” “official detention,” “deadly weapon,” “controlled substance,” “law,” “possess” — AS

11.81.900

Escape in the first, second, third, and fourth degree — AS 11.56 — 11.56.330

Original Code Provision — AS

33.30.055

.

TD: IV, 51.

For definition of terms used in this chapter, see AS

11.56.900

; for definition of terms used in this title, see AS

11.81.900

.

Administrative Code. —

For security, see 22 AAC 5, art. 2.